Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ISUROON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731, for a grant to Isuroon. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriation must be used to: new text end new text begin (1) provide loans to microbusinesses to promote entrepreneurship and economic growth in underserved communities; new text end new text begin (2) award grants to microbusinesses to support start-up costs, capacity building, and business sustainability; new text end new text begin (3) deliver technical assistance and training to entrepreneurs, including support for business operations, financial management, and development strategies; and new text end new text begin (4) establish and operate a business incubator program to support microbusinesses with shared resources, mentorship, and access to professional networks. new text end new text begin (c) Priority must be given to businesses owned by women, immigrants, and members of communities of color in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (d) By January 15, 2027, Isuroon must submit a report to the commissioner of employment and economic development and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development regarding: new text end new text begin (1) the number of loans and grants distributed and the total amount awarded; new text end new text begin (2) demographic information of recipients, including geographic location and business types; and new text end new text begin (3) outcomes of the businesses supported by this program, including revenue growth, job creation, and participation in the business incubator program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end